Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Voting

§ 17-16-720.
Shareholders' list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical or numerical list of the identities of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting. The list shall be arranged by voting group, and within each voting group by class or series of shares, and show the number of shares held by each shareholder. The list shall also show each shareholder’s physical mailing address, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s name, and each shareholder’s authorized means of receipt for electronic transmissions, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s data address.

The shareholders’ list shall be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning two (2) business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation’s principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A shareholder, his agent, or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of W.S. 17-16-1602(c), to copy the list, during regular business hours and at the shareholder’s expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the shareholders’ list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, his agent, or attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder, his agent, or attorney to inspect the shareholders’ list before or at the meeting, or to copy the list as permitted by subsection (b) of this section, the district court of the county where a corporation’s principal office or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located, on application of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense, order payment by the corporation of the shareholder’s cost of suit including reasonable attorney fees and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders’ list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2018 ch. 47, § 1, effective March 10, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the shareholder's” for “his” in the last sentence of (b).

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), inserted “or numerical” following “alphabetical,” substituted “list of the identities of all” for “list of the names of all” in the first sentence, deleted “address of and” preceding “number of shares” in the second sentence, added the third sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 47, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transfer of stock of deceased owner on books as necessary to permit personal representative to vote it, 7 ALR3d 629.

§ 17-16-721.
Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class, is entitled to one (1) vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders’ meeting. Only shares are entitled to vote.

Unless authorized by a district court, the shares of a corporation are not entitled to vote if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to vote for directors of the second corporation.

Subsection (b) of this section does not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.

Redeemable shares are not entitled to vote after notice of redemption is mailed to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “subsections (b) and (d)” for “subsections (b) and (c)” in (a); and added “Unless authorized by a district court” in (b).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of foreign personal representative or guardian to vote stock owned by estate or ward, 41 ALR2d 1082.

Voting of jointly held or fractional shares in corporation, 98 ALR2d 357.

Who may exercise voting power of corporate stock pending settlement of estate of deceased owner, 7 ALR3d 629.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock, 68 ALR3d 680.

Validity of variations from one share-one vote rule under modern corporate law, 3 ALR4th 1204.

§ 17-16-722.
Proxies.

A shareholder may vote his shares in person or by proxy.

A shareholder or his agent or attorney-in-fact may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the shareholder by signing an appointment form or by an electronic transmission. An electronic transmission shall contain or be accompanied by information from which one can determine that the shareholder, the shareholder’s agent, or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact authorized the electronic transmission.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when a signed appointment form or an electronic transmission of the appointment is received by the inspector of election or the officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for eleven (11) months unless a longer period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable unless the appointment form or electronic transmission states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under W.S.

17-16-731

.

The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises his authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (d) of this section is revoked when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

A transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if he did not know of its existence when he acquired the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to W.S.

17-16-724

and to any express limitation on the proxy’s authority stated in the appointment form or electronic transmission, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), deleted “either manually or in facsimile” after “shareholder by signing” in the first sentence, and substituted “shall” for “must” after “An electronic transmission” in the last sentence; and added “form” at the end of (c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Expenses incurred by competing factions within corporation in soliciting proxies as charge against corporation, 51 ALR2d 873.

Power of inspectors of elections relating to irregular or conflicting proxies, 44 ALR3d 1443.

Misrepresentation in proxy solicitation — state cases, 20 ALR4th 1287.

§ 17-16-723.
Shares held by nominees.

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

The procedure may set forth:

The types of nominees to which it applies;

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

The manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

The information that shall be provided when the procedure is selected;

The period for which selection of the procedure is effective; and

Other aspects of the rights and duties created.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-724.
Corporation's acceptance of votes.

If the name or network signature signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name or data address of a shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name or network signature signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name or data address of its shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an entity and the name or network signature signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name or network signature signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name or network signature signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name or network signature signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Two (2) or more persons are the shareholder as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name or network signature signed purports to be the name or data address of at least one (1) of the coowners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coowners.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section or W.S. 17-16-722(b) are not liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section or W.S. 17-16-722(b) is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2018 ch. 47, § 1, effective March 10, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

inserted “or network signature” and “or data address” following “name” throughout the section.

Laws 2018, ch. 47, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

§ 17-16-725.
Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to that matter. Unless the articles of incorporation or this act provide otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter.

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or shall be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter other than the election of directors by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or this act require a greater number of affirmative votes.

An amendment of articles of incorporation adding, changing or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater or lesser than specified in subsection (a) or (c) of this section is governed by W.S.

17-16-727

.

The election of directors is governed by W.S.

17-16-728

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-726.
Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the articles of incorporation or this act provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in W.S.

17-16-725

.

If the articles of incorporation or this act provide for voting by two (2) or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in W.S.

17-16-725

. Action may be taken by one (1) voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-727.
Changing quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater or lesser quorum or voting requirement for shareholders, or voting groups of shareholders, than is provided for by this act.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation that adds, changes or deletes a quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 17-16-728.
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “[all] [a designated voting group of] shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors,” or words of similar import, means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two (2) or more candidates.

Shares otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not be voted cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

A shareholder who has the right to cumulate his votes gives notice to the corporation not less than forty-eight (48) hours before the time set for the meeting of the shareholder’s intent to cumulate his votes during the meeting. If one (1) shareholder gives this notice all other shareholders in the same voting group participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the shareholder's” for “his” in the first sentence of (d)(ii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction, application and effect of constitutional provisions or statutes relating to cumulative voting of stock for corporate directors, 43 ALR2d 1322.

§ 17-16-729.
Inspectors of election.

A public corporation shall, and any other corporation may, appoint one (1) or more inspectors to act at a meeting of shareholders and make a written report of the inspectors’ determinations. Each inspector shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of the inspector’s ability.

The inspectors shall:

Ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each;

Determine the shares represented at a meeting;

Determine the validity of proxies and ballots;

Count all votes; and

Determine the result.

An inspector may be an officer or employee of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “A public corporation” for “A corporation having any shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one (1) or more members of a national or affiliated securities association” in (a).